North Carolina, session 2025, HB367.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 13 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-266.5B. Statewide sexual assault examination kit victim notification.
(a) Victim Right to Information. – A victim for whom a sexual assault examination kit is
submitted to the State Crime Laboratory or a laboratory approved by the State Crime Laboratory
pursuant to the testing protocols of G.S. 15A-266.5A shall have a right to know the current status
regarding the testing of the victim's sexual assault examination kit.
The State Crime Laboratory shall develop procedures by which victims may exercise the
right created under this subsection.
(b) Victim Right to Notification. – A victim for whom a sexual assault examination kit is
submitted to the State Crime Laboratory or a laboratory approved by the State Crime Laboratory
pursuant to the testing protocols of G.S. 15A-266.5A shall have a right to be notified in each of
the following circumstances:
(1) When a determination is made that the victim's sexual assault examination kit
is unable to be tested.
(2) When a decision is made not to test the victim's sexual assault examination kit
for a reason other than that found in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) When a decision is made to destroy the victim's sexual assault examination
kit.
The State Crime Laboratory shall develop procedures by which victims will be notified
pursuant to this subsection, including the manner in which victim contact information will be
gathered by the State Crime Laboratory or a laboratory approved by the State Crime Laboratory
and the method or methods by which victims will be notified. It shall be the responsibility of the
victim to ensure that the State Crime Laboratory or a laboratory approved by the State Crime
Laboratory has the victim's required and current contact information."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to sexual
assault examination kits submitted before, on, or after that date.
*H367-v-1*